Florida, session 2026, HB275.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (n) of subsection (6) of section
627.351, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
627.351 Insurance risk apportionment plans.—
(6) CITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.—
(n)1. Rates for coverage provided by the corporation must
be actuarially sound pursuant to s. 627.062 and not competitive
with approved rates charged in the admitted voluntary market so
that the corporation functions as a residual market mechanism to
provide insurance only when insurance cannot be procured in the
voluntary market, except as otherwise provided in this
paragraph. The office shall provide the corporation such
information as would be necessary to determine whether rates are
competitive. The corporation shall file its recommended rates
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb275-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 275 2026
with the office at least annually. The corporation shall provide
any additional information regarding the rates which the office
requires. The office shall consider the recommendations of the
board and issue a final order establishing the rates for the
corporation within 45 days after the recommended rates are
filed. The corporation may not pursue an administrative
challenge or judicial review of the final order of the office.
2. In addition to the rates otherwise determined pursuant
to this paragraph, the corporation shall impose and collect an
amount equal to the premium tax provided in s. 624.509 to
augment the financial resources of the corporation.
3. After the public hurricane loss-projection model under
s. 627.06281 has been found to be accurate and reliable by the
Florida Commission on Hurricane Loss Projection Methodology, the
model shall be considered when establishing the windstorm
portion of the corporation's rates. The corporation may use the
public model results in combination with the results of private
models to calculate rates for the windstorm portion of the
corporation's rates. This subparagraph does not require or allow
the corporation to adopt rates lower than the rates otherwise
required or allowed by this paragraph.
4. The corporation must make a recommended actuarially
sound rate filing for each personal and commercial line of
business it writes.
5. Notwithstanding the board's recommended rates and the
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb275-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 275 2026
office's final order regarding the corporation's filed rates
under subparagraph 1., the corporation shall annually implement
a rate increase which, except for sinkhole coverage, does not
exceed the following for any single policy issued by the
corporation, excluding coverage changes and surcharges:
a. Twelve percent for 2023.
b. Thirteen percent for 2024.
c. Fourteen percent for 2025.
d. Fifteen percent for 2026 and all subsequent years.
6. The corporation may also implement an increase to
reflect the effect on the corporation of the cash buildup factor
pursuant to s. 215.555(5)(b).
7. The corporation's implementation of rates as prescribed
in subparagraphs 5. and 8. shall cease for any line of business
written by the corporation upon the corporation's implementation
of actuarially sound rates. Thereafter, the corporation shall
annually make a recommended actuarially sound rate filing that
is not competitive with approved rates in the admitted voluntary
market for each commercial and personal line of business the
corporation writes.
8. New or renewal personal lines policies that do not
cover a primary residence are not subject to the rate increase
limitations in subparagraph 5., but may not be charged more than
50 percent above, nor less than, the prior year's established
rate for the corporation.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb275-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 275 2026
9. As used in this paragraph, the term "primary residence"
means the dwelling that is the policyholder's primary home or is
a rental property that is the primary home of the tenant, and
which the policyholder or tenant occupies for more than 9 months
of each year.
10.a. For an order establishing the rates for the
corporation issued pursuant to subparagraph 1. on or after June
1, 2026, the requirements of subparagraphs 5. and 8. do not
apply to any new policy issued by the corporation, including
when such policy is subsequently renewed by the corporation.
b. Sub-subparagraph a. does not apply to any new policy
that covers a primary residence located in a county where the
office determines there is not a reasonable degree of
competition.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb275-00